Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1600.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 173.936 is amended to read:
173.936. (1) Records and information of the Legislative Equity Officer appointed in ORS 173.900
that relate to disclosures, reports or other allegations made to the equity officer or that relate to
investigations, reports or counseling undertaken by the equity officer or by an [independent] inves-
tigator [or offsite process counselor] at the request or direction of the equity officer are exempt from
required disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478, except that:
[(1) A conduct complaint made under legislative branch personnel rules is disclosable when re-
quested;]
[(2) Records relating to an investigation of a member of the Legislative Assembly following a con-
duct complaint being made concerning the member are subject to disclosure after the fact-finding in-
vestigation has concluded, even if a legislative committee has not yet met or deliberated on the
investigation’s findings; and]
[(3) Records relating to an investigation of allegations of conduct prohibited by legislative branch
personnel rules and not described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section are subject to disclosure upon
a determination being made that the person who was the subject of the investigation is subject to re-
medial measures or discipline.]
(a) A final investigative report in which a member of the Legislative Assembly is the
respondent is disclosable when the report is delivered to the appropriate conduct committee;
(b) A final investigative report in which someone other than a member of the Legislative
Assembly is a respondent is subject to disclosure upon a determination being made that the
person who was the subject of the investigation is subject to remedial measures or discipline;
and
(c) Any agreement that serves as a resolution of an investigation under legislative branch
personnel rules and in which the respondent is a member of the Legislative Assembly, or a
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 332

SB 1600
written summary of such an investigation, is subject to disclosure, except that identifying
information about any individual who is not a member of the Legislative Assembly may be
redacted.
(2) As used in this section, “investigative report” and “respondent” have the meanings
given those terms in legislative branch personnel rules.
SECTION 2. ORS 40.252 is amended to read:
40.252. (1) In addition to any other limitations on privilege that may be imposed by law, there
is no privilege under ORS 40.225, 40.230, 40.250[,] or 40.264 [or 40.274] for communications if:
(a) In the professional judgment of the person receiving the communications, the communi-
cations reveal that the declarant has a clear and serious intent at the time the communications are
made to subsequently commit a crime involving physical injury, a threat to the physical safety of
any person, sexual abuse or death or involving an act described in ORS 167.322;
(b) In the professional judgment of the person receiving the communications, the declarant poses
a danger of committing the crime; and
(c) The person receiving the communications makes a report to another person based on the
communications.
(2) The provisions of this section do not create a duty to report any communication to any
person.
(3) A person who discloses a communication described in subsection (1) of this section, or fails
to disclose a communication described in subsection (1) of this section, is not liable to any other
person in a civil action for any damage or injury arising out of the disclosure or failure to disclose.
SECTION 3. ORS 40.274, 173.930 and 173.933 are repealed.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]